Louisiana, session 2026, HB897.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:972.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§972.2. Protected health information of individuals receiving services
A. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the meanings
ascribed to them in this Subsection:
(1) "Department" means the Department of Children and Family Services.
(2) "General contractor" means an organization designated by statute or
contract to manage the provision of pregnancy center resources through subcontracts
with organizations that directly provide pregnancy center services. "General
contractor" includes any entity designated to serve a similar function regarding a
pregnancy center program or initiative, regardless of the formal label used.
(3) "Pregnancy center" or "center" means a facility that provides
pregnancy-related services including but not limited to ultrasounds, pregnancy
testing, or pregnancy counseling; or that otherwise collects health information from
individuals who are seeking or receiving services from the center.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-633 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 897
(4) "Protected health information" means any information related to an
individual's past, present, or future physical or mental health or condition that
contains information that identifies the individual or includes identifiable
information that could provide a reasonable basis to identify the individual.
(5) "Subcontractor" means an organization that provides pregnancy center
services in one or more locations by contract with the department or by contract with
a general contractor coordinating pregnancy center services or referrals under a
contract with the department.
C.(1) A pregnancy center, including a subcontractor operating or affiliated
with a pregnancy center, shall not disclose a client's name or protected health
information to any entity or individual outside of its organization without the written
permission of the client for that specific disclosure of information, unless the
disclosure is required by law or in accordance with Subsection G of this Section.
(2) A pregnancy center shall provide to a client a privacy notice prior to
obtaining written permission for any disclosure of protected health information. The
privacy notice may be provided once at the initiation of services and may describe
categories of permitted uses and disclosures. A separate written authorization shall
not be required for each individual use or disclosure that is consistent with the
privacy notice or in accordance with Subsection G of this Section. The privacy notice
shall include all of the following:
(a) The specific purpose for disclosing the protected health information to
a third party.
(b) The specific types of protected health information to be disclosed.
(c) The third parties who might or will receive protected health information.
(3) A pregnancy center shall further provide a simple mechanism for a client
to revoke any consent previously granted for the disclosure of information.
(4) A pregnancy center shall provide the client, without charge, a copy of all
of the individual's records or information in the possession or control of the center
within ten business days of a client's request.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-633 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 897
(5) A general contractor that obtains or receives protected health information
of a client related to a contract with a subcontractor or pregnancy center, or by virtue
of the relationship with such entities, shall not disclose the client's name or any
protected health information to any entity outside of its organization except as
provided for in Subsection G of this Section.
D. Nothing provided herein shall be construed to prevent a general
contractor or subcontractor from disclosing information that maintains the
confidentiality of an individual client, such as the number of clients who have been
provided with particular goods or services, or prohibiting disclosures as otherwise
required by or reasonably necessary for the department to exercise its oversight
authority.
E.(1) Any person who believes there has been a violation of the privacy
requirements of this Section has the right to file a complaint with the department.
(2) If the department has cause to believe a violation of this Section may
have occurred, the department shall investigate the matter and determine whether a
violation has occurred.
(3) If the department determines that a violation of this Section has occurred,
it shall further determine the responsibility of a general contractor or subcontractor
and shall initiate an enforcement action. An enforcement action may include any of
the following:
(a) A warning.
(b) An imposition of monetary fines.
(4) Any penalty assessed against a general contractor or subcontractor shall
be commensurate with the degree of responsibility attributed to that entity by the
department.
(5) Any action taken pursuant to this Section shall be in accordance with
applicable state contracting laws, rules, and procedures, including notice and an
opportunity to respond.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-633 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 897
(6) Any monetary fine imposed in accordance with this Section shall not
exceed five thousand dollars per violation. In determining the amount of the fine,
the department shall consider the nature and severity of the violation, the extent of
harm, the entity's history of prior violations, and the degree of cooperation with the
investigation.
F.(1) The requirements of this Section apply to any organization that
receives state or federal funding, whether directly or indirectly, by contract, grant,
or other cooperative endeavor arrangement through a program or initiative managed,
monitored, or administered by the Department of Children and Family Services,
which provides payment for pregnancy center services, pregnancy center referrals,
pregnancy center marketing, or administrative functions of the program or initiative,
including but not limited to the Louisiana Pregnancy and Baby Care Initiative and
Thrive: The Baby and Parent Network.
(2) The general contractor or a subcontractor has the responsibility, along
with a pregnancy center, for ensuring the requirements of this Section are met with
respect to that center.
G.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary, a
pregnancy center, general contractor, or subcontractor may use or disclose protected
health information without a separate written authorization when such use or
disclosure is for any of the following purposes:
(a) Providing services, treatment, or care to the client.
(b) Coordinating or managing the client's care, including referrals to
healthcare providers, social service providers, or other support services.
(c) Carrying out internal administrative, quality assurance, training,
compliance, or operational activities and related functions necessary to support the
provision of services, including activities conducted on behalf of the pregnancy
center.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-633 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 897
(2) Any use or disclosure made in accordance with this Subsection shall be
limited to the minimum necessary information and shall remain subject to
confidentiality protections provided for in this Section.